Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 11-45-101.
[Amended and renumbered]

Amended and renumbered as §

9-12-1101

by Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 2.

§ 11-45-102.
[Renumbered]

Renumbered as §

9-12-1102

by Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 3.

§ 11-45-104.
[Amended and renumbered]

Amended and renumbered as §

9-12-1104

by Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 2.

§ 11-45-105.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 101, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2004, ch. 119, § 1, related to pilot programs.